Washington statutes.
RCW 39.10.390

General contractor/construction manager procedure—Subcontract work.

(1) Except as provided in this section, bidding on subcontract work or for the supply of equipment or materials by the general contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries is prohibited.

(2) The general contractor/construction manager, or its subsidiaries, may bid on subcontract work or for the supply of equipment or materials if:

(a) The work within the subcontract bid package or equipment or materials is customarily performed or supplied by the general contractor/construction manager;

(b) The bid opening is managed by the public body and is in compliance with RCW 39.10.380; and

(c) Notification of the general contractor/construction manager's intention to bid is included in the public solicitation of bids for the bid package or for the equipment or materials.

(3) In no event may the general contractor/construction manager or its subsidiaries assign warranty responsibility or the terms of its contract or purchase order with vendors for equipment or material purchases to subcontract bid package bidders or subcontractors who have been awarded a contract. The value of subcontract work performed and equipment and materials supplied by the general contractor/construction manager may not exceed 30 percent of the negotiated maximum allowable construction cost, unless procured as a heavy civil construction project under this chapter. Negotiated support services performed by the general contractor/construction manager shall not be considered subcontract work for purposes of this subsection.

[ 2021 c 230 s 13; 2014 c 42 s 7; 2013 c 222 s 16; 2007 c 494 s 306.]

NOTES:

Sunset Act application: See note following chapter digest.

Effective date—2021 c 230: See note following RCW 39.10.210.

Effective date—2013 c 222: See note following RCW 39.10.210.